Utah statutes.
31A-31-108.5.   Insurance Fraud Victim Restitution Fund.

(1)  There is created an expendable special revenue fund known as the "Insurance Fraud Victim Restitution Fund."

(2)  The Insurance Fraud Victim Restitution Fund shall consist of money ordered paid under Subsections 31A-31-109(1)(a)(i) and (2)(a).

(3)  The commissioner shall administer the Insurance Fraud Victim Restitution Fund for the sole benefit of insurance fraud victims.



Enacted by Chapter 319, 2013 General Session

